Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7616
Offering of plan; how construed.

(1) The offering of a health benefit plan by any multiple employer welfare arrangement shall not be deemed transacting business as an insurer, association, or exchange, except as specifically set forth in the Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement Act. The insurance laws of this state do not apply to health benefit plans offered by multiple employer welfare arrangements except as specifically set forth in the act.

(2) Nothing in the act shall be construed to include an insolvent multiple employer welfare arrangement within the provisions of the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 16.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.